Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-551
Class IV school district; board of education; members; election; student member.

The board of education of a Class IV school district shall consist of seven members and also may include a nonvoting student member or members selected pursuant to section 79-559. Voting members shall be elected as provided in section 32-544. Voting members of the board shall begin the duties of their office on the third Monday of the month in which they are elected.

Laws 1978, LB 457, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 305, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 303, § 5;

Laws 1982, LB 688, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 440, § 4;

Laws 1985, LB 244, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 603;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-902.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 304.

For qualifications of members of board of education, see section 79-543.

Vacancies, see section 79-545.